Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3156.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; HUMAN TRAFFICKING INVESTIGATORS TASK FORCE.new text end new text begin $4,900,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $4,900,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for the Human Trafficking Investigators Task Force. The base for this appropriation is $4,900,000 in fiscal year 2028 and thereafter. new text end